Louisiana, session 2026, HB715.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 2:135.3(A) and (B) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§135.3. Aerial applicators; discrimination prohibited; conditions for use of public
airports
A.(1) No city, town, or other political subdivision of this state which
establishes airports or landing fields, or which acquires, leases, or sets apart real
property for such purposes shall use any aspect of its authority to discriminate
against the use of such airports or landing fields by any aerial applicator
appropriately licensed by the Department of Agriculture and Forestry for aerial
application of seeds, fertilizers, or pesticides provided pesticides, provided that such
aerial applicator complies with all regulations as may be promulgated by the airport
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 715 ENROLLED
owner or operator or the Department of Transportation and Development for the
furtherance of flying safety and protection of the airport environs.
B. (2) In the event that any airport authority objects to the use of its facilities
by a licensed aerial applicator, the office of agricultural and environmental sciences
of the Department of Agriculture and Forestry shall upon request send a
representative to inspect and monitor the field prior to, during, and after the use by
the aerial applicator to ascertain if any harmful chemicals and other residues remain
as a result of the use by the aerial applicator. If the commissioner of the Department
of Agriculture and Forestry determines that the applicator is or has been in violation,
the commissioner shall have the authority to suspend the offending applicator from
further use of the airport or landing strip.
B.(1) As a condition of using a publicly owned airport or landing field within
this state, or participation in an airport priority program, any aerial applicator
licensed by the Department of Agriculture and Forestry shall operate a functioning
aircraft transponder consistent with applicable federal aviation regulations, including
but not limited to an Automatic Dependent Surveillance-Broadcast (ADS-B Out)
system compliant with 14 CFR Part 91.225 or a Mode C transponder compliant with
14 CFR Part 91.215, and an operable two-way radio capable of communicating with
airport traffic or advisory services when such services are available.
(2) The requirements of this Subsection shall apply solely during the
operation of an aircraft in connection with takeoff from or landing at a public airport
or landing field for the purpose of public safety and coordination of airport surface
and traffic operations.
(3) An aerial applicator operating at a publicly owned airport or landing field
within this state that does not have an operating control tower shall follow the
standard traffic pattern as recommended by the Federal Aviation Administration,
unless any of the following occurs:
(a) Safety considerations require deviation.
(b) Wind conditions, runway configuration, or aircraft performance
characteristics dictate otherwise.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 715 ENROLLED
(c) Receipt of direction from air traffic control or Federal Aviation
Administration guidance.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.